GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/italian.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
! main categories
+Adj 
+Adv 
+Interj
+Noun 
+Number
+Verb 
+Pron

! additional features
+Acc
+Apoc
+AMod
+Aton 
+Aux 
+Card
+Comp
+Dat
+Dem
+Fem
+Masc
+MF
+Modal
+Ne
+Pl
+Refl
+Sg
+SP
+Sup
+Trans
+VMod
+1P
+2P
+3P

! boundaries
^| 
^=

! internal symbols
^DelE

LEXICON ROOT
	MAIN;
	V_ESSERE;


! verb inflection features
LEXICON	V00A1	< %+PresInd:0 %+1P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00A2	< %+PresInd:0 %+2P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00A3	< %+PresInd:0 %+3P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00A4	< %+PresInd:0 %+1P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00A5	< %+PresInd:0 %+2P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00A6	< %+PresInd:0 %+3P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;

LEXICON	V00B1	< %+ImpInd:0 %+1P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00B2	< %+ImpInd:0 %+2P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00B3	< %+ImpInd:0 %+3P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00B4	< %+ImpInd:0 %+1P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00B5	< %+ImpInd:0 %+2P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00B6	< %+ImpInd:0 %+3P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;

LEXICON	V00C1	< %+Perf:0 %+1P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00C2	< %+Perf:0 %+2P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00C3	< %+Perf:0 %+3P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00C4	< %+Perf:0 %+1P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00C5	< %+Perf:0 %+2P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00C6	< %+Perf:0 %+3P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;

LEXICON	V00D1	< %+FutInd:0 %+1P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00D2	< %+FutInd:0 %+2P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00D3	< %+FutInd:0 %+3P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00D4	< %+FutInd:0 %+1P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00D5	< %+FutInd:0 %+2P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00D6	< %+FutInd:0 %+3P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;

LEXICON	V00E1	< %+PresSubj:0 %+1P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00E2	< %+PresSubj:0 %+2P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00E3	< %+PresSubj:0 %+3P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00E4	< %+PresSubj:0 %+1P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00E5	< %+PresSubj:0 %+2P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00E6	< %+PresSubj:0 %+3P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;

LEXICON	V00F1	< %+ImpSubj:0 %+1P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00F2	< %+ImpSubj:0 %+2P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00F3	< %+ImpSubj:0 %+3P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00F4	< %+ImpSubj:0 %+1P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00F5	< %+ImpSubj:0 %+2P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00F6	< %+ImpSubj:0 %+3P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;

LEXICON	V00G1	< %+Cond:0 %+1P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00G2	< %+Cond:0 %+2P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00G3	< %+Cond:0 %+3P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00G4	< %+Cond:0 %+1P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00G5	< %+Cond:0 %+2P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00G6	< %+Cond:0 %+3P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;

LEXICON V00H	< %+PresPart:0 %+MF:0 %+Sg:e >	OPTCLITIC;
		< %+PresPart:0 %+MF:0 %+Pl:i >	OPTCLITIC;

LEXICON V00I	< %+PastPart:0 %+Masc:0 %+Sg:o >	OPTCLITIC;
		< %+PastPart:0 %+Fem:0 %+Sg:a >		OPTCLITIC;
		< %+PastPart:0 %+Masc:0 %+Pl:i >	OPTCLITIC;
		< %+PastPart:0 %+Fem:0 %+Pl:e >		OPTCLITIC;

LEXICON V00L	< %+Gerund:0 >			OPTCLITIC;

LEXICON V00M	< %+Inf:0 >			#;
		< %+Inf:0 0:%^DelE >		OPTCLITIC;

LEXICON	V00N2	< %+Impv:0 %+2P:0 %+Sg:0 >	OPTCLITIC;
LEXICON	V00N3	< %+Impv:0 %+3P:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON	V00N4	< %+Impv:0 %+1P:0 %+Pl:0 >	OPTCLITIC;
LEXICON	V00N5	< %+Impv:0 %+2P:0 %+Pl:0 >	OPTCLITIC;
LEXICON	V00N6	< %+Impv:0 %+3P:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;




!===============================================================================
!VERB : CLASSE 1   (amare)
!radice/i: am
!
!TEMPO     COD         1          2          3          4          5          6
!
!ind_pre   a           o          i          a       iamo        ate        ano
!ind_imp   b         avo        avi        ava      avamo      avate      avano
!pas_rem   c          ai       asti         o`       ammo       aste      arono
!futuro    d        ero`       erai       era`      eremo      erete     eranno
!con_pre   e           i          i          i       iamo       iate        ino
!con_imp   f        assi       assi       asse     assimo       aste     assero
!condiz    g        erei     eresti     erebbe     eremmo     ereste   erebbero
!part_pre  h        ante       anti
!part_pas  i         ato (ata,ati,ate)
!gerundio  l        ando
!infinito  m         are
!imperat   n                      a         i        iamo        ate        ino


LEXICON V01A1	0:o		V00A1;
LEXICON V01A2	0:i		V00A2;
LEXICON V01A3	0:a		V00A3;
LEXICON V01A4	0:iamo		V00A4;
LEXICON V01A5	0:ate		V00A5;
LEXICON V01A6	0:ano		V00A6;
LEXICON V01A	V01A1; V01A2; V01A3; V01A4; V01A5; V01A6;

LEXICON V01B1	0:avo		V00B1;
LEXICON V01B2	0:avi		V00B2;
LEXICON V01B3	0:ava		V00B3;
LEXICON V01B4	0:avamo		V00B4;
LEXICON V01B5	0:avate		V00B5;
LEXICON V01B6	0:avano		V00B6;
LEXICON V01B	V01B1; V01B2; V01B3; V01B4; V01B5; V01B6;

LEXICON V01C1	0:ai		V00C1;
LEXICON V01C2	0:asti		V00C2;
LEXICON V01C3	0:ò		V00C3;
LEXICON V01C4	0:ammo		V00C4;
LEXICON V01C5	0:aste		V00C5;
LEXICON V01C6	0:arono		V00C6;
LEXICON V01C	V01C1; V01C2; V01C3; V01C4; V01C5; V01C6;

LEXICON V01D1	0:erò		V00D1;
LEXICON V01D2	0:erai		V00D2;
LEXICON V01D3	0:erà		V00D3;
LEXICON V01D4	0:eremo		V00D4;
LEXICON V01D5	0:erete		V00D5;
LEXICON V01D6	0:eranno		V00D6;
LEXICON V01D	V01D1; V01D2; V01D3; V01D4; V01D5; V01D6;

LEXICON V01E1	0:i		V00E1;
LEXICON V01E2	0:i		V00E2;
LEXICON V01E3	0:i		V00E3;
LEXICON V01E4	0:iamo		V00E4;
LEXICON V01E5	0:iate		V00E5;
LEXICON V01E6	0:ino		V00E6;
LEXICON V01E	V01E1; V01E2; V01E3; V01E4; V01E5; V01E6;

LEXICON V01F1	0:assi		V00F1;
LEXICON V01F2	0:assi		V00F2;
LEXICON V01F3	0:asse		V00F3;
LEXICON V01F4	0:assimo	V00F4;
LEXICON V01F5	0:aste		V00F5;
LEXICON V01F6	0:assero	V00F6;
LEXICON V01F	V01F1; V01F2; V01F3; V01F4; V01F5; V01F6;

LEXICON V01G1	0:erei		V00G1;
LEXICON V01G2	0:eresti	V00G2;
LEXICON V01G3	0:erebbe	V00G3;
LEXICON V01G4	0:eremmo	V00G4;
LEXICON V01G5	0:ereste	V00G5;
LEXICON V01G6	0:erebbero	V00G6;
LEXICON V01G	V01G1; V01G2; V01G3; V01G4; V01G5; V01G6;

LEXICON V01H	0:ant		V00H;
LEXICON V01I	0:at		V00I;	
LEXICON V01L	0:ando		V00L;	
LEXICON V01M	0:are		V00M;
	
LEXICON V01N2	0:a		V00N2;
LEXICON V01N3	0:i		V00N3;
LEXICON V01N4	0:iamo		V00N4;
LEXICON V01N5	0:ate		V00N5;
LEXICON V01N6	0:ino		V00N6;
LEXICON V01N	V01N2; V01N3; V01N4; V01N5; V01N6;

LEXICON V01	V01A; V01B; V01C; V01D; V01E; V01F; V01G; 
		V01H; V01I; V01L; V01M; V01N;

!===============================================================================
!VERB : CLASSE 2   (temere)
!radice/i: tem
!
!TEMPO     COD         1          2          3          4         5          6
!
!ind_pre   a           o          i          e       iamo       ete        ono 
!ind_imp   b         evo        evi        eva      evamo     evate      evano
!pas_rem   c          ei       esti         e`       emmo      este      erono
!          c        etti                  ette                          ettero
!futuro    d        ero`       erai       era`      eremo     erete     eranno
!con_pre   e           a          a         a        iamo      iate        ano 
!con_imp   f        essi       essi      esse      essimo      este     essero
!condiz    g        erei     eresti    erebbe      eremmo    ereste   erebbero
!part_pre  h        ente       enti
!part_pas  i         uto (uta,uti,ute)
!gerundio  l        endo
!infinito  m         ere
!imperat   n                      i          a       iamo       ete        ano

LEXICON V02A1	0:o		V00A1;
LEXICON V02A2	0:i		V00A2;
LEXICON V02A3	0:e		V00A3;
LEXICON V02A4	0:iamo		V00A4;
LEXICON V02A5	0:ete		V00A5;
LEXICON V02A6	0:ono		V00A6;
LEXICON V02A	V02A1; V02A2; V02A3; V02A4; V02A5; V02A6;

LEXICON V02B1	0:evo		V00B1;
LEXICON V02B2	0:evi		V00B2;
LEXICON V02B3	0:eva		V00B3;
LEXICON V02B4	0:evamo		V00B4;
LEXICON V02B5	0:evate		V00B5;
LEXICON V02B6	0:evano		V00B6;
LEXICON V02B	V02B1; V02B2; V02B3; V02B4; V02B5; V02B6;

LEXICON V02C1	0:ei		V00C1;
		0:etti		V00C1;
LEXICON V02C2	0:esti		V00C2;
LEXICON V02C3	0:è		V00C3;
		0:ette		V00C3;
LEXICON V02C4	0:emmo		V00C4;
LEXICON V02C5	0:este		V00C5;
LEXICON V02C6	0:erono		V00C6;
LEXICON V02C	V02C1; V02C2; V02C3; V02C4; V02C5; V02C6;

LEXICON V02D1	0:erò		V00D1;
LEXICON V02D2	0:erai		V00D2;
LEXICON V02D3	0:erà		V00D3;
LEXICON V02D4	0:eremo		V00D4;
LEXICON V02D5	0:erete		V00D5;
LEXICON V02D6	0:eranno		V00D6;
LEXICON V02D	V02D1; V02D2; V02D3; V02D4; V02D5; V02D6;

LEXICON V02E1	0:a		V00E1;
LEXICON V02E2	0:a		V00E2;
LEXICON V02E3	0:a		V00E3;
LEXICON V02E4	0:iamo		V00E4;

LEXICON V_ESSERE
 essere+Verb+Aux:sono		V00A1;
 essere+Verb+Aux:sei		V00A2;
 essere+Verb+Aux:siamo		V00A4;
 essere+Verb+Aux:siete		V00A5;
 essere+Verb+Aux:sono		V00A6;
 essere+Verb+Aux:ero		V00B1;
 essere+Verb+Aux:eri		V00B2;
 essere+Verb+Aux:era		V00B3;
 essere+Verb+Aux:eravamo	V00B4;
 essere+Verb+Aux:eravate	V00B5;
 essere+Verb+Aux:erano		V00B6;
 essere+Verb+Aux:fui		V00C1;
 essere+Verb+Aux:fosti		V00C2;
 essere+Verb+Aux:fu		V00C3;
 essere+Verb+Aux:fummo		V00C4;
 essere+Verb+Aux:foste		V00C5;
 essere+Verb+Aux:furono		V00C6;
 essere+Verb+Aux:sarò		V00D1;
 essere+Verb+Aux:sarai		V00D2;
 essere+Verb+Aux:sarà		V00D3;
 essere+Verb+Aux:saremo		V00D4;
 essere+Verb+Aux:sarete		V00D5;
 essere+Verb+Aux:saranno	V00D6;
 essere+Verb+Aux:sia		V00E1;
 essere+Verb+Aux:sia		V00E2;
 essere+Verb+Aux:sia		V00E3;
 essere+Verb+Aux:siamo		V00E4;
 essere+Verb+Aux:siate		V00E5;
 essere+Verb+Aux:siano		V00E6;
 essere+Verb+Aux:fossi		V00F1;
 essere+Verb+Aux:fossi		V00F2;
 essere+Verb+Aux:fosse		V00F3;
 essere+Verb+Aux:fossimo	V00F4;
 essere+Verb+Aux:foste		V00F5;
 essere+Verb+Aux:fossero	V00F6;
 essere+Verb+Aux:sarei		V00G1;
 essere+Verb+Aux:saresti	V00G2;
 essere+Verb+Aux:sarebbe	V00G3;
 essere+Verb+Aux:saremmo	V00G4;
 essere+Verb+Aux:sareste	V00G5;
 essere+Verb+Aux:sarebbero	V00G6;
 essere+Verb+Aux:essent		V00H;
 essere+Verb+Aux:stat		V00I;	
 essere+Verb+Aux:essendo	V00L;	
 essere+Verb+Aux:sii		V00N2;
 essere+Verb+Aux:sia		V00N3;
 essere+Verb+Aux:siamo		V00N4;
 essere+Verb+Aux:sate		V00N5;
 essere+Verb+Aux:siano		V00N6;
LEXICON MAIN
bisognare+Verb+Trans:bisogn	V01A3;
bisognare+Verb+Trans:bisogn	V01B3;
bisognare+Verb+Trans:bisogn	V01B6;
bisognare+Verb+Trans:bisogn	V01C3;
bisognare+Verb+Trans:bisogn	V01C6;
bisognare+Verb+Trans:bisogn	V01D3;
bisognare+Verb+Trans:bisogn	V01D6;
bisognare+Verb+Trans:bisogn	V01F3;
bisognare+Verb+Trans:bisogn	V01F6;
bisognare+Verb+Trans:bisogn	V01G3;
bisognare+Verb+Trans:bisogn	V01G6;
estrarre+Verb+Trans:estrarre	V00M;
fare+Verb+Trans:fa	V00A3;	!AS@26/08/2008
fare+Verb+Trans:fa	V00N2;	!AS@26/08/2008
potere+Verb+Modal:pot	V02A5;
potere+Verb+Modal:può	V00A3;	!? AS@18/07/2008
predire+Verb+Trans:predic	V02A1;
predire+Verb+Trans:predic	V02A6;
prescindere+Verb:prescind	V02D;
protrarre+Verb+Trans:protrarre	V00M;
prudere+Verb:prud	V02A;
ridire+Verb+Trans:ridic	V02A2;
ridire+Verb+Trans:ridic	V02A3;
ridire+Verb+Trans:ridic	V02A4;
sapere+Verb+Trans:sappia	V00N3;
sapere+Verb+Trans:s	V01A3;
sciare+Verb:sci	V01A1;
sciare+Verb:sci	V01A2;
sciare+Verb:sci	V01A6;
sciare+Verb:sci	V01E3;
sciare+Verb:sci	V01E6;
soccombere+Verb+Trans:soccomb	V02C;
soddisfare+Verb+Trans:soddisf	V01A;
soddisfare+Verb+Trans:soddisf	V01D;
soddisfare+Verb+Trans:soddisf	V01E;
soggiacere+Verb:soggiacc	V02E1;
soggiacere+Verb:soggiacc	V02E2;
soggiacere+Verb:soggiacc	V02E3;
soggiacere+Verb:soggiacc	V02E4;
soggiacere+Verb:soggiacq	V02C1;
soggiacere+Verb:soggiacq	V02C3;
soggiacere+Verb:soggiacq	V02C6;
spiare+Verb+Trans:spi	V01A1;
spiare+Verb+Trans:spi	V01A2;
spiare+Verb+Trans:spi	V01A5;
spiare+Verb+Trans:spi	V01B;
spiare+Verb+Trans:spi	V01C;
spiare+Verb+Trans:spi	V01E1;
spiare+Verb+Trans:spi	V01E2;
spiare+Verb+Trans:spi	V01E3;
spiare+Verb+Trans:spi	V01E5;
spiare+Verb+Trans:spi	V01E6;
spiare+Verb+Trans:spi	V01F;
spiare+Verb+Trans:sp	V01A4;
spiare+Verb+Trans:sp	V01E4;
spronare+Verb+Trans:spron	V01;
sussistere+Verb:sussist	V02B;
sviare+Verb+Trans:svi	V01E1;
sviare+Verb+Trans:svi	V01E2;
sviare+Verb+Trans:svi	V01N3;
sviare+Verb+Trans:sv	V01A4;
sviare+Verb+Trans:sv	V01A5;
sviare+Verb+Trans:sv	V01A6;
sviare+Verb+Trans:sv	V01B;
sviare+Verb+Trans:sv	V01C;
sviare+Verb+Trans:sv	V01D;
sviare+Verb+Trans:sv	V01E4;
sviare+Verb+Trans:sv	V01E5;
sviare+Verb+Trans:sv	V01F;
sviare+Verb+Trans:sv	V01G;
sviare+Verb+Trans:sv	V01H;
sviare+Verb+Trans:sv	V01I;
sviare+Verb+Trans:sv	V01L;
sviare+Verb+Trans:sv	V01M;
sviare+Verb+Trans:sv	V01N2;
sviare+Verb+Trans:sv	V01N4;
sviare+Verb+Trans:sv	V01N5;
sviare+Verb+Trans:sv	V01N6;
tacere+Verb:tac	V02C2;
tacere+Verb:tac	V02C4;
tacere+Verb:tac	V02C5;
vigere+Verb:vig	V02B3;
vigere+Verb:vig	V02B6;
